Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.094

Washington technology solutions—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in Washington technology solutions to the chief information officer, the chief information officer's confidential secretary, and assistant directors, and up to twelve positions in the planning component involved in policy development and/or senior professionals.

[ 2024 c 54 s 36; 2015 c 225 s 54; 1987 c 504 s 7.]